apertium-nhi.nhi.lexc
LEXICON AuxHuitzi ! Auxiliar acción repentina
@D.Sa.Pl@@D.PST@+huitzi%<vaux%>:@D.Sa.Pl@@D.PST@ti%>huitzi # ;
@R.Sa.Pl@@D.PST@+huitzi%<vaux%>:@R.Sa.Pl@@D.PST@ti%>huitzih # ;
@R.Sa.Pl@@D.PST@+huitzi%<vaux%>:@R.Sa.Pl@@D.PST@ti%>huitze # ; ! Dir/LR

@D.Sa.Pl@@D.PST@+huitzi%<vaux%>%<fut%>:@D.Sa.Pl@@D.PST@ti%>huitzi%>z # ;
@R.Sa.Pl@@D.PST@+huitzi%<vaux%>%<fut%>:@R.Sa.Pl@@D.PST@ti%>huitzi%>zque # ;! Dir/LR
@R.Sa.Pl@@D.PST@+huitzi%<vaux%>%<fut%>:@R.Sa.Pl@@D.PST@ti%>huitzi%>zqueh # ;

@D.Sa.Pl@@R.PST@+huitzi%<vaux%>%<pret%>:@D.Sa.Pl@@R.PST@ti%>huitz # ;
@R.Sa.Pl@@R.PST@+huitzi%<vaux%>%<pret%>:@R.Sa.Pl@@R.PST@ti%>huitz%>que # ;! Dir/LR
@R.Sa.Pl@@R.PST@+huitzi%<vaux%>%<pret%>:@R.Sa.Pl@@R.PST@ti%>huitz%>queh # ;

@D.Sa.Pl@@R.PST@+huitzi%<vaux%>%<impf%>:@D.Sa.Pl@@R.PST@ti%>huitzi%>ya # ;
@R.Sa.Pl@@R.PST@+huitzi%<vaux%>%<impf%>:@R.Sa.Pl@@R.PST@ti%>huitzi%>yah # ;


LEXICON AuxQuiza ! Auxiliar ...caminando?
@D.Sa.Pl@@D.PST@+quiza%<vaux%>:@D.Sa.Pl@@D.PST@ti%>quiza # ;
@R.Sa.Pl@@D.PST@+quiza%<vaux%>:@R.Sa.Pl@@D.PST@ti%>quizah # ;

@D.Sa.Pl@@D.PST@+quiza%<vaux%>%<fut%>:@D.Sa.Pl@@D.PST@ti%>quiza%>z # ;
@R.Sa.Pl@@D.PST@+quiza%<vaux%>%<fut%>:@R.Sa.Pl@@D.PST@ti%>quiza%>zque # ;! Dir/LR
@R.Sa.Pl@@D.PST@+quiza%<vaux%>%<fut%>:@R.Sa.Pl@@D.PST@ti%>quiza%>zqueh # ;


@D.Sa.Pl@@R.PST@+quiza%<vaux%>%<pret%>:@D.Sa.Pl@@R.PST@ti%>quiz # ;
@R.Sa.Pl@@R.PST@+quiza%<vaux%>%<pret%>:@R.Sa.Pl@@R.PST@ti%>quiz%>que # ;! Dir/LR
@R.Sa.Pl@@R.PST@+quiza%<vaux%>%<pret%>:@R.Sa.Pl@@R.PST@ti%>quiz%>queh # ;


@D.Sa.Pl@@R.PST@+quiza%<vaux%>%<impf%>:@D.Sa.Pl@@R.PST@ti%>quiza%>ya # ;
@R.Sa.Pl@@R.PST@+quiza%<vaux%>%<impf%>:@R.Sa.Pl@@R.PST@ti%>quiza%>yah # ;


LEXICON PresentTense
@D.Sa.Pl@@D.PST@@D.Opt@%<pres%>:@D.Sa.Pl@@D.PST@@D.Opt@ # ;
@R.Sa.Pl@@D.PST@@D.Opt@%<pres%>:@R.Sa.Pl@@D.PST@@D.Opt@h # ;

! TODO: is this actually a variation, or just a subordinating "in" after the verb?
@R.Sa.Pl@@D.PST@@D.Opt@%<pres%>:@R.Sa.Pl@@D.PST@@D.Opt@n # ; ! Dir/LR 

LEXICON Durative
@D.Sa.Pl@@D.PST@@D.Opt@%<pres%>%<dur%>:@D.Sa.Pl@@D.PST@@D.Opt@toc # ;
@R.Sa.Pl@@D.PST@@D.Opt@%<pres%>%<dur%>:@R.Sa.Pl@@D.PST@@D.Opt@toque # ;! Dir/LR
@R.Sa.Pl@@D.PST@@D.Opt@%<pres%>%<dur%>:@R.Sa.Pl@@D.PST@@D.Opt@toqueh # ;

@D.Sa.Pl@@R.PST@@D.Opt@%<pst%>%<dur%>:@D.Sa.Pl@@R.PST@@D.Opt@to%>ya # ;
@R.Sa.Pl@@R.PST@@D.Opt@%<pst%>%<dur%>:@R.Sa.Pl@@R.PST@@D.Opt@to%>yah # ;

@D.Sa.Pl@@D.PST@@D.Opt@%<fut%>%<dur%>:@D.Sa.Pl@@D.PST@@D.Opt@to%>z # ;
@R.Sa.Pl@@D.PST@@D.Opt@%<fut%>%<dur%>:@R.Sa.Pl@@D.PST@@D.Opt@to%>zque # ;! Dir/LR
@R.Sa.Pl@@D.PST@@D.Opt@%<fut%>%<dur%>:@R.Sa.Pl@@D.PST@@D.Opt@to%>zqueh # ;

@R.PST@@D.Sa.Pl@@D.Opt@%<cfact%>%<dur%>:@R.PST@@D.Sa.Pl@@D.Opt@to%>zquia # ;
@R.PST@@R.Sa.Pl@@D.Opt@%<cfact%>%<dur%>:@R.PST@@R.Sa.Pl@@D.Opt@to%>zquiah # ;

@D.PST@@D.Sa.Pl@@D.Opt@%<cni%>%<dur%>:@D.PST@@D.Sa.Pl@@D.Opt@to%>zquia # ;
@D.PST@@R.Sa.Pl@@D.Opt@%<cni%>%<dur%>:@D.PST@@R.Sa.Pl@@D.Opt@to%>zquiah # ;

AuxiliarySuffixes ;


LEXICON Imperfect
@D.Sa.Pl@@R.PST@@D.Opt@%<impf%>:@D.Sa.Pl@@R.PST@@D.Opt@ya  # ;
@R.Sa.Pl@@R.PST@@D.Opt@%<impf%>:@R.Sa.Pl@@R.PST@@D.Opt@yah # ;

LEXICON Preterite
@D.Sa.Pl@@D.Opt@@R.PST@%<pret%>:@D.Sa.Pl@@D.Opt@@R.PST@%{c%}  # ;
@R.Sa.Pl@@D.Opt@@R.PST@%<pret%>:@R.Sa.Pl@@D.Opt@@R.PST@que # ;! Dir/LR
@R.Sa.Pl@@D.Opt@@R.PST@%<pret%>:@R.Sa.Pl@@D.Opt@@R.PST@queh # ;

LEXICON Pluperfect
@D.Sa.Pl@@D.Opt@@R.PST@%<plu%>:@D.Sa.Pl@@D.Opt@@R.PST@ca   # ;
@R.Sa.Pl@@D.Opt@@R.PST@%<plu%>:@R.Sa.Pl@@D.Opt@@R.PST@cah  # ;

@D.Sa.Pl@@D.Opt@%<plu%>:@D.Sa.Pl@@D.Opt@ca   # ; ! Dir/LR
@R.Sa.Pl@@D.Opt@%<plu%>:@R.Sa.Pl@@D.Opt@cah  # ; ! Dir/LR

LEXICON Future
@D.PST@@D.Sa.Pl@@D.Opt@%<fut%>:@D.PST@@D.Sa.Pl@@D.Opt@z    # ;
@D.PST@@R.Sa.Pl@@D.Opt@%<fut%>:@D.PST@@R.Sa.Pl@@D.Opt@zque # ;! Dir/LR
@D.PST@@R.Sa.Pl@@D.Opt@%<fut%>:@D.PST@@R.Sa.Pl@@D.Opt@zqueh # ;

@D.PST@@D.Sa.Pl@@D.Opt@%<fut%>:@D.PST@@D.Sa.Pl@@D.Opt@z   AuxNiqui;


LEXICON Counterfactual
@R.PST@@D.Sa.Pl@@D.Opt@%<cfact%>:@R.PST@@D.Sa.Pl@@D.Opt@zquia # ;
@R.PST@@R.Sa.Pl@@D.Opt@%<cfact%>:@R.PST@@R.Sa.Pl@@D.Opt@zquiah # ;
@R.PST@@D.Sa.Pl@@D.Opt@%<impf%>%<cfact%>:@R.PST@@D.Sa.Pl@@D.Opt@zquia%>ya # ;
@R.PST@@R.Sa.Pl@@D.Opt@%<impf%>%<cfact%>:@R.PST@@R.Sa.Pl@@D.Opt@zquia%>yah # ;

LEXICON Conditional
@D.PST@@D.Sa.Pl@@D.Opt@%<cni%>:@D.PST@@D.Sa.Pl@@D.Opt@zquia # ;
@D.PST@@R.Sa.Pl@@D.Opt@%<cni%>:@D.PST@@R.Sa.Pl@@D.Opt@zquiah # ;

LEXICON Optative
@D.PST@@D.Sa.Pl@@R.Opt@%<opt%>:@D.PST@@D.Sa.Pl@@R.Opt@0   # ;
@D.PST@@R.Sa.Pl@@R.Opt@%<opt%>:@D.PST@@R.Sa.Pl@@R.Opt@can # ;

LEXICON DirectionAway
@D.PST@@D.Sa.Pl@@D.Opt@%<and%>:@D.PST@@D.Sa.Pl@@D.Opt@ti    # ;
@D.PST@@D.Sa.Pl@@D.Opt@%<and%>:@D.PST@@D.Sa.Pl@@D.Opt@tiuh    # ;
@D.PST@@R.Sa.Pl@@D.Opt@%<and%>:@D.PST@@R.Sa.Pl@@D.Opt@tihue # ;

@R.PST@@D.Sa.Pl@@D.Opt@%<pst%>%<and%>:@R.PST@@D.Sa.Pl@@D.Opt@to    # ;
@R.PST@@R.Sa.Pl@@D.Opt@%<pst%>%<and%>:@R.PST@@R.Sa.Pl@@D.Opt@toh # ;

@D.PST@@D.Sa.Pl@@R.Opt@%<opt%>%<and%>:@D.PST@@D.Sa.Pl@@R.Opt@ti    # ;
@D.PST@@R.Sa.Pl@@R.Opt@%<opt%>%<and%>:@D.PST@@R.Sa.Pl@@R.Opt@tican # ;

LEXICON DirectionToward
@D.PST@@D.Sa.Pl@@D.Opt@%<fut%>%<ven%>:@D.PST@@D.Sa.Pl@@D.Opt@qui    # ;
@D.PST@@R.Sa.Pl@@D.Opt@%<fut%>%<ven%>:@D.PST@@R.Sa.Pl@@D.Opt@quihue # ;

@R.PST@@D.Sa.Pl@@D.Opt@%<pst%>%<ven%>:@R.PST@@D.Sa.Pl@@D.Opt@co    # ;
@R.PST@@R.Sa.Pl@@D.Opt@%<pst%>%<ven%>:@R.PST@@R.Sa.Pl@@D.Opt@coh # ;

@D.PST@@D.Sa.Pl@@R.Opt@%<opt%>%<ven%>:@D.PST@@D.Sa.Pl@@R.Opt@qui    # ;
@D.PST@@R.Sa.Pl@@R.Opt@%<opt%>%<ven%>:@D.PST@@R.Sa.Pl@@R.Opt@quih # ;


! LEXICON Applicative
! %<appl%>:lia # ;
! %<appl%>%<fut%>:li%>z # ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
! Nominals
!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
LEXICON NominalSubject
! sg1: n-
! pl1: t-S-me / t-poss-S-huan

@P.Sa.Sg@%<s_sg1%>:@P.Sa.Sg@ni%>                      Predicate ;
@P.Sa.Sg@%<s_sg1%>:@P.Sa.Sg@in%>                      Predicate ; ! Dir/LR

@P.Sa.Sg@@P.Sa.2@%<s_sg2%>:@P.Sa.Sg@@P.Sa.2@ti%>      Predicate ;
@P.Sa.Sg@@P.Sa.2@%<s_sg2%>:@P.Sa.Sg@@P.Sa.2@it%>      Predicate ; ! Dir/LR

@P.Sa.Sg@%<s_sg3%>:@P.Sa.Sg@                          Predicate ;
@P.Sa.Pl@%<s_pl1%>:@P.Sa.Pl@ti%>                      Predicate ;
@P.Sa.Pl@%<s_pl1%>:@P.Sa.Pl@it%>                      Predicate ; ! Dir/LR

@P.Sa.Pl@%<s_pl2%>:@P.Sa.Pl@ni%>                      Predicate ;
@P.Sa.Pl@%<s_pl2%>:@P.Sa.Pl@in%>                      Predicate ; ! Dir/LR

@P.Sa.Pl@%<s_pl3%>:@P.Sa.Pl@                          Predicate ;
                                                      Predicate ;

LEXICON Predicate
@R.Sa.2@:@R.Sa.2@                                     Honorific ;
                                                      Possession ;
                                                      Nominals ;
                                                      Numerales ;


LEXICON Possession

@P.Px.Sg@%<px1sg%>:@P.Px.Sg@no%>               Nominals ;
@P.Px.Sg@%<px2sg%>:@P.Px.Sg@mo%>               Nominals ;
@P.Px.Sg@%<px3sg%>:@P.Px.Sg@i%>                Nominals ;
@P.Px.Sg@%<px3sg%>:@P.Px.Sg@ni%>               Nominals ; ! Dir/LR
@P.Px.Pl@%<px1pl%>:@P.Px.Pl@to%>               Nominals ;
@P.Px.Pl@%<px2pl%>:@P.Px.Pl@nimo%>             Nominals ;
@P.Px.Pl@%<px2pl%>:@P.Px.Pl@namo%>             Nominals ;
@P.Px.Pl@%<px3pl%>:@P.Px.Pl@im%>               Nominals ; ! Dir/LR
@P.Px.Pl@%<px3pl%>:@P.Px.Pl@in%>               Nominals ;

@P.Px.Sg@%<px3aa%>:@P.Px.Sg@te%>               Nominals ;
@P.Px.Sg@%<px3nn%>:@P.Px.Sg@tla%>              Nominals ;


LEXICON Nominals 
! Sustantivos, sustantivos relacionales y otras categorias que
! pueden llevar posesión
                                                   Nouns ;
                                                   Adjetivos ;
                                                   Relacionales ;
                                                   Numerales ;

LEXICON Honorific !TODO: add i -> honorific vowel harmony in .twolc file.
%<hon%>:on%>                   Possession ;
%<hon%>:on%>                   Nominals ;

LEXICON IV-Stem
xotla%<v%>%<iv%>:xotla%>  PresentTense ;
xotla%<v%>%<iv%>:xotla%>  Imperfect ;
xotla%<v%>%<iv%>:xotla%>  Durative ;
ihtlacahui%<v%>%<iv%>:ihtlacahui%>  PresentTense;
ihtlacahui%<v%>%<iv%>:ihtlacahui%>  Imperfect;
ihtlacahui%<v%>%<iv%>:ihtlacauh%>  Durative;
chanchihua%<v%>%<iv%>:chanchihua%>  PresentTense;
chanchihua%<v%>%<iv%>:chanchihua%>  Imperfect;
chanchihua%<v%>%<iv%>:chanchiuh%>  Durative;
chohcholoa%<v%>%<iv%>:chohcholo%>  Durative;
huitz%<v%>%<iv%>:huitz%>  PresentTense;
hueyiya%<v%>%<iv%>:hueyiya%> Imperfect ;
miguixi%<v%>%<iv%>:miguix%>  Durative;
mohmohtia%<v%>%<iv%>:mohmohtia%>  PresentTense;
hueyicamohtia%<v%>%<iv%>:hueyicamohta%>  Imperfect;
nimi%<v%>%<iv%>:nin%>  Durative;
nihnimi%<v%>%<iv%>:nihnimi%>  PresentTense;
tona%<v%>%<iv%>:tona%> Imperfect ;
pitlani%<v%>%<iv%>:pitlani%>  PresentTense;
tlacati%<v%>%<iv%>:tlacati%>  Imperfect;
pehui%<v%>%<iv%>:peuh%>  Durative;
timoa%<v%>%<iv%>:timoa%>  PresentTense;
tici%<v%>%<iv%>:tici%>  Imperfect;
pinahua%<v%>%<iv%>:pinahua%>  PresentTense;
elmoyahui%<v%>%<iv%>:elmoyahui%>  Imperfect;
tlacoya%<v%>%<iv%>:tlacox%>  Durative;
tlaciceya%<v%>%<iv%>:tlaciceya%>  PresentTense;
tlaciceya%<v%>%<iv%>:tlaceceya%>  Imperfect; ! Dir/LR
tzahtzi%<v%>%<iv%>:tzahtzi%>  PresentTense;
tlapohua%<v%>%<iv%>:tlapohua%>  Durative;
yoli%<v%>%<iv%>:yoli%>  PresentTense;
chicahui%<v%>%<iv%>:chicahui%>  Imperfect;
motta%<v%>%<iv%>:motz%>      Durative ;
mohuiyonia%<v%>%<iv%>:mohuiyonia%>     PresentTense ;
ehco%<v%>%<iv%>:ehco%>     Imperfect ;
LEXICON TV-Stem
imaginaroa%<v%>%<tv%>:imaginaro%>  Durative;
cuatiqui%<v%>%<iv%>:cuatiqui%>  PresentTense;
chiya%<v%>%<tv%>:chiya%>  Imperfect;
panahuia%<v%>%<tv%>:panahui%>  Durative ;
tilinia%<v%>%<tv%>:tilinia%> PresentTense ;
tiquitiltia%<v%>%<tv%>:tiquitiltia%>  Imperfect ;
itonia%<v%>%<tv%>:%{i%}toni%>  Durative ;
tlamochihua%<v%>%<tv%>:tlamochihua%>  PresentTense;
tetzahuia%<v%>%<tv%>:tetzahua%>  Imperfect;
vaciaroa%<v%>%<tv%>:vaciaro%>  Durative;
ahhua%<v%>%<tv%>:ahhua%>  Durative;
atequia%<v%>%<tv%>:atequia%>          PresentTense;
aprenderoa%<v%>%<tv%>:aprenderoa%>  Imperfect;
felicitaroa%<v%>%<tv%>:felicitaroh%>  Durative;
ahcoitta%<v%>%<tv%>:ahcoita%>     PresentTense ;
nextia%<v%>%<tv%>:nexta%>  Imperfect;
waltlaixtemohtia%<v%>%<tv%>:waltlaixtemohti%>  Durative ;
mohtia%<v%>%<tv%>:mohtia%> PresentTense ;
enviaroa%<v%>%<tv%>:enviaroa%>  Imperfect ;
pohpoloa%<v%>%<tv%>:pohpoloh%>  Durative ;
quixtia%<v%>%<tv%>:quixtia%>          PresentTense;
aquixtia%<v%>%<tv%>:aquixta%>           Imperfect;
patla%<v%>%<tv%>:patla%>  Durative;
cahua%<v%>%<tv%>:cahua%>  PresentTense;
cahcahua%<v%>%<tv%>:cahcahua%>  Imperfect;
partaroa%<v%>%<tv%>:partaro%>  Durative;
cocoa%<v%>%<tv%>:cocoa%>  PresentTense;
conservaroa%<v%>%<tv%>:conservaroa%>  Imperfect;
huatza%<v%>%<tv%>:huatz%> Durative ;
tlancua%<v%>%<tv%>:tlancua%>  PresentTense;
nacascua%<v%>%<tv%>:nacascua%>  Imperfect;
camacui%<v%>%<tv%>:camacui%>  Durative;
ehua%<v%>%<tv%>:ehua%>  PresentTense;
cauhtehua%<v%>%<tv%>:cauhtehua%>  Imperfect;
tenehua%<v%>%<tv%>:teneuh%>  Durative;
leeroa%<v%>%<tv%>:leeroa%>  PresentTense;
machilia%<v%>%<tv%>:machila%>  Imperfect;
mochilia%<v%>%<tv%>:mochilih%>  Durative;
manteneroa%<v%>%<tv%>:manteneroa%>  PresentTense;
namaca%<v%>%<tv%>:namaca%>  Imperfect;
tlamaca%<v%>%<tv%>:tlamaca%>  Durative;
matemoa%<v%>%<tv%>:matemoa%>  PresentTense;
matemoa%<v%>%<tv%>:matemoh%>  Durative;
napaloa%<v%>%<tv%>:napaloa%>  Imperfect;
tlatlahtlania%<v%>%<tv%>:tlatlahtlanih%>  Durative;
meme%<v%>%<tv%>:meme%>  PresentTense;
tlami%<v%>%<tv%>:tlami%>  Imperfect;
pachoa%<v%>%<tv%>:pacho%>  Durative;
pan%>tlatihuitia%<v%>%<tv%>:pan%>tlatihuitia%> PresentTense ;
hueyilia%<v%>%<tv%>:hueyilia%>  Imperfect ;
hueyitilia%<v%>%<tv%>:hueyitili%>  Durative ;
titlanilia%<v%>%<tv%>:titlanilia%> PresentTense ;
tzilinia%<v%>%<tv%>:tzilina%>  Imperfect;
yolchicahua%<v%>%<tv%>:yolchicauh%>  Durative;
LEXICON TV2-Stem
ilhuia%<v%>%<tv%>:ilhuia%> PresentTense ;
choquilia%<v%>%<tv%>:choquila%>  Imperfect ;
cuaquiltia%<v%>%<tv%>:cuaquiltih%>  Durative;
chupahuilia%<v%>%<tv%>:chupahuilia%> PresentTense ;
uilia%<v%>%<tv%>:uilia%>  Imperfect ;
hualiquilia%<v%>%<tv%>:hualiquilih%> Durative ;
